en: Transmission fluid specification: ATF+4; BMW LT 71141; Dexron II; Dexron III; Dexron VI; Honda DW-1; JWS 3309; Mercon; Mercon LV; Mercon V; Nissan Matic J; Nissan Matic S; SP-III; SP-IV; Toyota WS; ZF Lifeguard; Other
de: Spezifikation des Getriebeöls: ATF+4; BMW LT 71141; Dexron II; Dexron III; Dexron VI; Honda DW-1; JWS 3309; Mercon; Mercon LV; Mercon V; Nissan Matic J; Nissan Matic S; SP-III; SP-IV; Toyota WS; ZF Lifeguard; Sonstige
hr-HR: Specifikacija ulja za mjenjač: ATF+4; BMW LT 71141; Dexron II; Dexron III; Dexron VI; Honda DW-1; JWS 3309; Mercon; Mercon LV; Mercon V; Nissan Matic J; Nissan Matic S; SP-III; SP-IV; Toyota WS; ZF Lifeguard; Ostalo
fr: Spécification du liquide de transmission: ATF+4; BMW LT 71141; Dexron II; Dexron III; Dexron VI; Honda DW-1; JWS 3309; Mercon; Mercon LV; Mercon V; Nissan Matic J; Nissan Matic S; SP-III; SP-IV; Toyota WS; ZF Lifeguard; Autre
da: Specifikation for transmissionsvæske: ATF+4; BMW LT 71141; Dexron II; Dexron III; Dexron VI; Honda DW-1; JWS 3309; Mercon; Mercon LV; Mercon V; Nissan Matic J; Nissan Matic S; SP-III; SP-IV; Toyota WS; ZF Lifeguard; Andet
th: ข้อกำหนดของน้ำมันเกียร์: ATF+4; BMW LT 71141; Dexron II; Dexron III; Dexron VI; Honda DW-1; JWS 3309; Mercon; Mercon LV; Mercon V; Nissan Matic J; Nissan Matic S; SP-III; SP-IV; Toyota WS; ZF Lifeguard; อื่นๆ
cs: Specifikace převodové kapaliny: ATF+4; BMW LT 71141; Dexron II; Dexron III; Dexron VI; Honda DW-1; JWS 3309; Mercon; Mercon LV; Mercon V; Nissan Matic J; Nissan Matic S; SP-III; SP-IV; Toyota WS; ZF Lifeguard; Jiné
es: Especificación del fluido de transmisión: ATF+4; BMW LT 71141; Dexron II; Dexron III; Dexron VI; Honda DW-1; JWS 3309; Mercon; Mercon LV; Mercon V; Nissan Matic J; Nissan Matic S; SP-III; SP-IV; Toyota WS; ZF Lifeguard; Otra
pl: Specyfikacja płynu do skrzyni biegów: ATF+4; BMW LT 71141; Dexron II; Dexron III; Dexron VI; Honda DW-1; JWS 3309; Mercon; Mercon LV; Mercon V; Nissan Matic J; Nissan Matic S; SP-III; SP-IV; Toyota WS; ZF Lifeguard; Inne
sk-SK: Špecifikácia prevodovej kvapaliny: ATF+4; BMW LT 71141; Dexron II; Dexron III; Dexron VI; Honda DW-1; JWS 3309; Mercon; Mercon LV; Mercon V; Nissan Matic J; Nissan Matic S; SP-III; SP-IV; Toyota WS; ZF Lifeguard; Iné
nb: Spesifikasjon for girolje: ATF+4; BMW LT 71141; Dexron II; Dexron III; Dexron VI; Honda DW-1; JWS 3309; Mercon; Mercon LV; Mercon V; Nissan Matic J; Nissan Matic S; SP-III; SP-IV; Toyota WS; ZF Lifeguard; Annet
pt-BR: Fluido de transmissão especificação: ATF+4; BMW LT 71141; Dexron II; Dexron III; Dexron VI; Honda DW-1; JWS 3309; Mercon; Mercon LV; Mercon V; Nissan Matic J; Nissan Matic S; SP-III; SP-IV; Toyota WS; ZF Lifeguard; Outro
pt-PT: Especificação do fluido de transmissão: ATF+4; BMW LT 71141; Dexron II; Dexron III; Dexron VI; Honda DW-1; JWS 3309; Mercon; Mercon LV; Mercon V; Nissan Matic J; Nissan Matic S; SP-III; SP-IV; Toyota WS; ZF Lifeguard; Outro
vi: Thông số kỹ thuật dầu hộp số: ATF+4; BMW LT 71141; Dexron II; Dexron III; Dexron VI; Honda DW-1; JWS 3309; Mercon; Mercon LV; Mercon V; Nissan Matic J; Nissan Matic S; SP-III; SP-IV; Toyota WS; ZF Lifeguard; Khác
lt-LT: Transmisijos skysčio specifikacija: ATF+4; BMW LT 71141; Dexron II; Dexron III; Dexron VI; Honda DW-1; JWS 3309; Mercon; Mercon LV; Mercon V; Nissan Matic J; Nissan Matic S; SP-III; SP-IV; Toyota WS; ZF Lifeguard; Kita
ko: 변속기 오일 사양: ATF+4; BMW LT 71141; Dexron II; Dexron III; Dexron VI; Honda DW-1; JWS 3309; Mercon; Mercon LV; Mercon V; Nissan Matic J; Nissan Matic S; SP-III; SP-IV; Toyota WS; ZF Lifeguard; 기타
el: Προδιαγραφές υγρού μετάδοσης: ATF+4; BMW LT 71141; Dexron II; Dexron III; Dexron VI; Honda DW-1; JWS 3309; Mercon; Mercon LV; Mercon V; Nissan Matic J; Nissan Matic S; SP-III; SP-IV; Toyota WS; ZF Lifeguard; Άλλο
fi: Vaihteistonesteen määritys: ATF+4; BMW LT 71141; Dexron II; Dexron III; Dexron VI; Honda DW-1; JWS 3309; Mercon; Mercon LV; Mercon V; Nissan Matic J; Nissan Matic S; SP-III; SP-IV; Toyota WS; ZF Lifeguard; Muu
hu: Váltófolyadék-specifikáció: ATF+4; BMW LT 71141; Dexron II; Dexron III; Dexron VI; Honda DW-1; JWS 3309; Mercon; Mercon LV; Mercon V; Nissan Matic J; Nissan Matic S; SP-III; SP-IV; Toyota WS; ZF Lifeguard; Egyéb
sl-SI: Specifikacija tekočine za menjalnik: ATF+4; BMW LT 71141; Dexron II; Dexron III; Dexron VI; Honda DW-1; JWS 3309; Mercon; Mercon LV; Mercon V; Nissan Matic J; Nissan Matic S; SP-III; SP-IV; Toyota WS; ZF Lifeguard; Drugo
tr: Şanzıman yağı özellikleri: ATF+4; BMW LT 71141; Dexron II; Dexron III; Dexron VI; Honda DW-1; JWS 3309; Mercon; Mercon LV; Mercon V; Nissan Matic J; Nissan Matic S; SP-III; SP-IV; Toyota WS; ZF Lifeguard; Diğer
it: Specifiche del fluido della trasmissione: ATF+4; BMW LT 71141; Dexron II; Dexron III; Dexron VI; Honda DW-1; JWS 3309; Mercon; Mercon LV; Mercon V; Nissan Matic J; Nissan Matic S; SP-III; SP-IV; Toyota WS; ZF Lifeguard; Altro
ro-RO: Specificația fluidului de transmisie: ATF+4; BMW LT 71141; Dexron II; Dexron III; Dexron VI; Honda DW-1; JWS 3309; Mercon; Mercon LV; Mercon V; Nissan Matic J; Nissan Matic S; SP-III; SP-IV; Toyota WS; ZF Lifeguard; Altele
ru: Спецификация трансмиссионной жидкости: ATF+4; BMW LT 71141; Dexron II; Dexron III; Dexron VI; Honda DW-1; JWS 3309; Mercon; Mercon LV; Mercon V; Nissan Matic J; Nissan Matic S; SP-III; SP-IV; Toyota WS; ZF Lifeguard; Другое
ja: トランスミッションフルード仕様: ATF+4; BMW LT 71141; Dexron II; Dexron III; Dexron VI; Honda DW-1; JWS 3309; Mercon; Mercon LV; Mercon V; Nissan Matic J; Nissan Matic S; SP-III; SP-IV; Toyota WS; ZF Lifeguard; その他
nl: Transmissievloeistof specificatie: ATF+4; BMW LT 71141; Dexron II; Dexron III; Dexron VI; Honda DW-1; JWS 3309; Mercon; Mercon LV; Mercon V; Nissan Matic J; Nissan Matic S; SP-III; SP-IV; Toyota WS; ZF Lifeguard; Overig
sv: Specifikation för transmissionsolja: ATF+4; BMW LT 71141; Dexron II; Dexron III; Dexron VI; Honda DW-1; JWS 3309; Mercon; Mercon LV; Mercon V; Nissan Matic J; Nissan Matic S; SP-III; SP-IV; Toyota WS; ZF Lifeguard; Övrigt
bg-BG: Спецификация на трансмисионната течност: ATF+4; BMW LT 71141; Dexron II; Dexron III; Dexron VI; Honda DW-1; JWS 3309; Mercon; Mercon LV; Mercon V; Nissan Matic J; Nissan Matic S; SP-III; SP-IV; Toyota WS; ZF Lifeguard; Друго
zh-TW: 變速箱油規格: ATF+4; BMW LT 71141; Dexron II; Dexron III; Dexron VI; Honda DW-1; JWS 3309; Mercon; Mercon LV; Mercon V; Nissan Matic J; Nissan Matic S; SP-III; SP-IV; Toyota WS; ZF Lifeguard; 其他
zh-CN: 变速箱油规格: ATF+4; BMW LT 71141; Dexron II; Dexron III; Dexron VI; Honda DW-1; JWS 3309; Mercon; Mercon LV; Mercon V; Nissan Matic J; Nissan Matic S; SP-III; SP-IV; Toyota WS; ZF Lifeguard; 其他